Colorado, session 2026A, HB1249.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-240-107, amend
(6)(l) as follows:
12-240-107. Practice of medicine defined - exemptions from
licensing requirements - unauthorized practice by physician
assistants and anesthesiologist assistants - penalties - definitions -
rules.
(6) (l) Pursuant to section 12-240-138 (1)(d)(I), a physician
assistant is not authorized to own a majority of a medical practice;
EXCEPT THAT, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 12-240-138 (1)(d)(III), ONE
OR MORE PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS MAY OWN A MAJORITY OF A
CORPORATION ORGANIZED SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE OF PROVIDING
MEDICAL-AESTHETIC SERVICES.
-2- HB26-1249

SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 12-240-138, amend
(1) introductory portion, (1)(d)(I), (2), and (3); and add (1)(d)(III) as
follows:
12-240-138. Professional service corporations, limited liability
companies, and registered limited liability partnerships for the
practice of medicine - exceptions - definitions.
(1) Persons licensed to practice medicine by the board may form
professional service corporations for such persons' practice of medicine
under the "Colorado Business Corporation Act", articles 101 to 117 of
title 7, if the corporations are organized and operated in accordance with
the provisions of this section. The articles of incorporation of the
corporations shall MUST contain provisions complying with the following
requirements:
(d) (I) Except as specified in subsection SUBSECTIONS (1)(d)(II)
AND (1)(d)(III) of this section, all shareholders of the corporation are
persons INDIVIDUALS licensed by the board to practice medicine in the
state of Colorado who at all times own their shares in their own right;
except that one or more persons INDIVIDUALS licensed by the board as a
physician assistant may be a shareholder of the corporation as long as the
physician shareholders maintain majority ownership of the corporation.
The shareholders shall be individuals who, except for illness, accident,
time spent in the armed services, on vacations, and on leaves of absence
not to exceed one year, are actively engaged in the practice of medicine
or as a physician assistant in the offices of the corporation.
(III) IF A CORPORATION IS ORGANIZED SOLELY FOR THE PURPOSE
OF PROVIDING MEDICAL-AESTHETIC SERVICES, ONE OR MORE INDIVIDUALS
MAY BE A SHAREHOLDER OF THE CORPORATION IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS:
-3- HB26-1249

(A) AN ESTHETICIAN OR A COSMETOLOGIST WHO HOLDS AN ACTIVE
LICENSE ISSUED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 105 OF THIS TITLE 12;
(B) A LICENSED PRACTICAL NURSE, A REGISTERED NURSE, OR AN
ADVANCED PRACTICE REGISTERED NURSE WHO HOLDS AN ACTIVE LICENSE
ISSUED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 255 OF THIS TITLE 12; OR
(C) A PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT WHO HOLDS AN ACTIVE LICENSE
ISSUED BY THE BOARD PURSUANT TO SECTION 12-240-113.
(2) The corporation shall do nothing that, if done by a licensee
employed by the corporation, would violate the standards of professional
conduct as provided for in section 12-240-121 OR THAT ARE APPLICABLE
TO THE PROFESSIONAL PRACTICE OF THE LICENSEE. Any violation of this
section by the corporation is grounds for the board OR APPLICABLE
REGULATOR to revoke or suspend the license of the person or persons
responsible for the violation.
(3) Nothing in this section diminishes or changes the obligation
of each licensee employed by the corporation to conduct his or her THEIR
practice in accordance with the standards of professional conduct
provided for in section 12-240-121 OR THAT ARE APPLICABLE TO THE
PROFESSIONAL PRACTICE OF THE LICENSEE. Any licensee who, by act or
omission, causes the corporation to act or fail to act in a way that violates
the standards of professional conduct, including any provision of this
section, is personally responsible for such act or omission and is subject
to discipline for the act or omission.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
-4- HB26-1249

referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1249